Maryland, session 2026, HB1316.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
SUBTITLE 59. STUDY ON UNIVERSAL HEALTH CARE PROGRAM.
13–5901.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “COMMISSION” MEANS THE ADVISORY COMMISSION ON UNIVERSAL
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1316*

HOUSE BILL 1316
HEALTH CARE.
(C) “INSTITUTE” MEANS THE HILLTOP INSTITUTE AT THE UNIVERSITY OF
MARYLAND, BALTIMORE COUNTY.
13–5902.
(A) THE INSTITUTE SHALL CONDUCT A STUDY TO DETERMINE THE
FEASIBILITY OF ESTABLISHING A UNIVERSAL HEALTH CARE PROGRAM THROUGH A
SINGLE–PAYER HEALTH CARE SYSTEM IN THE STATE.
(B) THE STUDY SHALL EVALUATE ESTABLISHING A SINGLE–PAYER HEALTH
CARE SYSTEM MODEL THAT WOULD PROVIDE THE FOLLOWING TO ALL INDIVIDUALS
IN THE STATE:
(1) COMPREHENSIVE, AFFORDABLE, AND HIGH–QUALITY PUBLICLY
FINANCED HEALTH CARE COVERAGE PROVIDED IN A SEAMLESS AND EQUITABLE
MANNER, REGARDLESS OF INCOME, ASSETS, HEALTH STATUS, CITIZENSHIP OR
IMMIGRATION STATUS, OR AVAILABILITY OF OTHER HEALTH CARE COVERAGE;
(2) A BENEFIT PACKAGE COVERING PRIMARY CARE, PREVENTIVE
CARE, CHRONIC CARE, ACUTE EPISODIC CARE, REPRODUCTIVE CARE, INCLUDING
PREGNANCY, BIRTH CONTROL, AND ABORTION SERVICES, HOSPITAL SERVICES, AND
BEHAVIORAL HEALTH SERVICES, TO THE EXTENT THOSE SERVICES ARE AVAILABLE
UNDER STATE LAW;
(3) AT MINIMUM, THE 10 ESSENTIAL BENEFITS DESCRIBED UNDER
THE FEDERAL AFFORDABLE CARE ACT AND THE BENEFITS REQUIRED TO BE
COVERED UNDER MARYLAND HEALTH CONNECTIONS PLANS; AND
(4) THE REQUIRED BENEFITS UNDER THE MARYLAND MEDICAL
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM AND MEDICARE.
(C) IN CONDUCTING THE STUDY, THE INSTITUTE SHALL:
(1) REVIEW PLANS, ANALYSES, PROGRAMS, AND LEGISLATION IN
OTHER STATES REGARDING SINGLE–PAYER HEALTH CARE SYSTEMS;
(2) ANALYZE AND DEVELOP COST PROJECTIONS FOR PROVIDING AND
ADMINISTERING THE BENEFITS DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION AND THE COLLATERAL COSTS OF OPERATING A SINGLE–PAYER HEALTH
CARE SYSTEM, INCLUDING THE AMOUNTS AND MECHANISMS NECESSARY TO
FINANCE THE SYSTEM;

HOUSE BILL 1316 3
(3) CONSIDER HOW A UNIVERSAL HEALTH CARE PROGRAM COULD:
(I) IMPROVE HEALTH OUTCOMES, INCLUDING REDUCING
PREVENTABLE MORBIDITY;
(II) IMPROVE HEALTH CARE EQUITY;
(III) REDUCE HEALTH CARE DISPARITIES; AND
(IV) INCREASE HEALTH CARE ACCESS, PARTICULARLY IN URBAN
AND RURAL SETTINGS WITH LIMITED ACCESS TO HEALTH CARE SERVICES; AND
(4) EXAMINE AND MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS ON:
(I) FULLY INTEGRATING OR ALIGNING THE MARYLAND
MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM, MEDICARE, PRIVATE INSURANCE, AND THE
PROVISION OF HEALTH CARE BENEFITS TO STATE, COUNTY, AND MUNICIPAL
EMPLOYEES INTO OR WITHIN A UNIVERSAL HEALTH CARE PROGRAM;
(II) TRANSITIONING THE STATE’S ADVANCING ALL–PAYER
HEALTH EQUITY APPROACHES AND DEVELOPMENT (AHEAD) MODEL TO A
SINGLE–PAYER HEALTH CARE MODEL;
(III) TRANSITIONING WORKERS DISPLACED BY CHANGES TO THE
HEALTH CARE SYSTEM;
(IV) CREATING AN OPERATING STRUCTURE FOR A
SINGLE–PAYER HEALTH CARE SYSTEM;
(V) CONTAINING COSTS BY REDUCING UNNECESSARY
ADMINISTRATIVE EXPENSES; AND
(VI) WHETHER A SINGLE–PAYER HEALTH CARE SYSTEM SHOULD
INCLUDE DENTAL, VISION, HEARING, AND LONG–TERM CARE BENEFITS.
13–5903.
(A) THERE IS AN ADVISORY COMMISSION ON UNIVERSAL HEALTH CARE.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE COMMISSION IS TO ASSIST THE INSTITUTE IN THE
DEVELOPMENT OF THE RECOMMENDATIONS FOR THE INSTITUTE’S FINAL REPORT
ON THE RESULTS OF THE STUDY CONDUCTED UNDER § 13–5902 OF THIS SUBTITLE.

HOUSE BILL 1316
(C) THE COMMISSION CONSISTS OF:
(1) ONE MEMBER OF THE SENATE OF MARYLAND, APPOINTED BY THE
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE;
(2) ONE MEMBER OF THE HOUSE OF DELEGATES, APPOINTED BY THE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE;
(3) THE SECRETARY, OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(4) THE SECRETARY OF BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT, OR THE
SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(5) THE SECRETARY OF COMMERCE, OR THE SECRETARY’S
DESIGNEE;
(6) THE SECRETARY OF LABOR, OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(7) THE SECRETARY OF SOCIAL AND ECONOMIC MOBILITY, OR THE
SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(8) THE SPECIAL SECRETARY OF SMALL, MINORITY, AND WOMEN
BUSINESS AFFAIRS, OR THE SPECIAL SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(9) TWO REPRESENTATIVES OF PUBLIC SECTOR LABOR UNIONS,
DESIGNATED BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE MARYLAND STATE AND DISTRICT OF
COLUMBIA AFL–CIO;
(10) TWO REPRESENTATIVES OF PRIVATE SECTOR LABOR UNIONS,
DESIGNATED BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE MARYLAND STATE AND DISTRICT OF
COLUMBIA AFL–CIO; AND
(11) THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR:
(I) THREE REPRESENTATIVES OF THE MARYLAND
ASSOCIATION OF COUNTIES, REPRESENTING THE GEOGRAPHIC AND POPULATION
DENSITY DIVERSITY OF THE STATE;
(II) THREE REPRESENTATIVES OF THE MARYLAND MUNICIPAL
LEAGUE, REPRESENTING THE GEOGRAPHIC AND POPULATION DENSITY DIVERSITY
OF THE STATE;

HOUSE BILL 1316 5
(III) THREE REPRESENTATIVES OF THE BUSINESS COMMUNITY,
AT LEAST ONE OF WHOM REPRESENTS A SMALL BUSINESS;
(IV) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF MEDCHI, THE MARYLAND
STATE MEDICAL SOCIETY;
(V) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MARYLAND HOSPITAL
ASSOCIATION;
(VI) ONE LICENSED NURSE WHO PRACTICES IN THE STATE;
(VII) ONE LICENSED SOCIAL WORKER WHO PRACTICES IN THE
STATE;
(VIII) ONE REPRESENTATIVE FROM A STATEWIDE ASSOCIATION
OF DENTISTS;
(IX) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF A NONGOVERNMENTAL
ORGANIZATION THAT PROVIDES HEALTH CARE AND SUPPORTIVE SERVICES TO
INDIVIDUALS EXPERIENCING HOMELESSNESS IN THE STATE;
(X) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF A NONGOVERNMENTAL
ORGANIZATION THAT PROVIDES HEALTH CARE TO OR ASSISTS WITH OBTAINING
HEALTH CARE FOR INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE UNINSURED, UNDERINSURED, OR
UNABLE TO OBTAIN INSURANCE;
(XI) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF A NONGOVERNMENTAL
ORGANIZATION THAT WORKS WITH FORMERLY INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS; AND
(XII) ONE REPRESENTATIVE FROM AN ORGANIZATION THAT
ASSISTS IMMIGRANTS.
(D) THE MEMBERS OF THE COMMISSION MAY NOT BE APPOINTED OR
DESIGNATED BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2028.
(E) THE GOVERNOR, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE PRESIDENT OF THE
SENATE AND THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE, SHALL DESIGNATE A CHAIR OF THE
COMMISSION.
(F) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, IN MAKING APPOINTMENTS TO THE
COMMISSION, THE GOVERNOR, THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE, AND THE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE SHALL ENSURE REGIONAL, ECONOMIC, ETHNIC, AND
GENDER DIVERSITY IN THE MEMBERSHIP OF THE COMMISSION.

HOUSE BILL 1316
(G) A MEMBER OF THE COMMISSION:
(1) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE
COMMISSION; BUT
(2) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE
STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
(H) THE INSTITUTE SHALL PROVIDE STAFF FOR THE COMMISSION.
13–5904.
(A) ON OR BEFORE JUNE 1, 2028, THE INSTITUTE SHALL SUBMIT AN
INTERIM REPORT ON ITS PRELIMINARY FINDINGS AND RECOMMENDATIONS FROM
THE STUDY CONDUCTED UNDER § 13–5902 OF THIS SUBTITLE TO THE COMMISSION
FOR COLLABORATIVE DISCUSSIONS, FEEDBACK, AND THE DEVELOPMENT OF FINAL
RECOMMENDATIONS.
(B) ON OR BEFORE JUNE 1, 2029, THE INSTITUTE AND THE COMMISSION
JOINTLY SHALL SUBMIT A FINAL REPORT OF THEIR FINDINGS AND
RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF
THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE SENATE BUDGET AND TAXATION
COMMITTEE, THE SENATE FINANCE COMMITTEE, THE HOUSE APPROPRIATIONS
COMMITTEE, AND THE HOUSE HEALTH COMMITTEE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) Section 1 of this Act is contingent on the Hilltop Institute at the University of
Maryland, Baltimore County receiving commitments for or receiving sufficient funding
through grants or private donations to conduct the study to determine the feasibility of
establishing a universal health care program in the State required under § 13–5902 of the
Health – General Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act.
(b) Within 5 days after determining that sufficient funding has been committed
or received, the Hilltop Institute shall notify the Department of Legislative Services.
(c) If notice of the commitment or receipt of sufficient funding is received by the
Department of Legislative Services on or before December 31, 2026, Section 1 of this Act
shall take effect on the date the notice is received by the Department of Legislative Services
in accordance with subsection (b) of this section.
(d) If notice of the commitment or receipt of sufficient funding is not received by
the Department of Legislative Services on or before December 31, 2026, Section 1 of this
Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be null and void.

HOUSE BILL 1316 7
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to Section 2 of this
Act, this Act shall take effect June 1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 3 years
and 7 months and, at the end of December 31, 2029, this Act, with no further action required
by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.